Maryland, session 2025, HB1532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
23–202.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the emissions control
program shall provide for a biennial exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment and
misfueling inspection for all vehicles of the 1977 model year and each model year thereafter.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1532*

HOUSE BILL 1532
23–204.1.
A FACILITY ESTABLISHED OR APPROVED UNDER § 23–303 OF THIS TITLE MAY
NOT DETERMINE THAT A MOTOR VEHICLE HAS FAILED TO PASS A TEST OR
INSPECTION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR ANY REASON OTHER THAN A
DETERMINATION THAT:
(1) FOR AN EMISSIONS EQUIPMENT AND MISFUELING INSPECTION:
(I) REQUIRED EMISSIONS EQUIPMENT IS NOT PRESENT; OR
(II) THE VEHICLE HAS BEEN MISFUELED; OR
(2) FOR AN EXHAUST EMISSIONS TEST, THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT
IN COMPLIANCE WITH AN APPLICABLE EMISSIONS STANDARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.